cs: Pro dospělé > Zbraně a příslušenství ke zbraním > Zbraně: Boxery; Obušky; Bojové nože; Střelné zbraně; Slzné a pepřové spreje; Nunčaky; Kopí a halapartny; Tyčové a obuškové zbraně; Paralyzéry a tasery; Meče; Vrhací hvězdice; Biče
hu: Érett > Fegyverek és fegyverkiegészítők > Fegyverek: Boxerek; Botok és gumibotok; Harci kések; Fegyverek; Buzogány és paprika spray; Nuncsaku; Dárdák; Botok és pálcás fegyverek; Sokkolófegyverek; Kardok; Dobócsillagok; Ostorok
pt-PT: Para adultos > Armas e acessórios para armas > Armas: Soqueiras; Tacos e bastões; Facas de combate; Armas de fogo; Mace e gás pimenta; Matracas; Lanças; Bastões e varas; Pistolas paralisantes e tasers; Espadas; Estrelas da morte; Chicotes
fr: Mature > Armes et accessoires d’armes > Armes: Coups-de-poing américains; Massues et matraques; Couteaux de combat; Armes à feu; Macis et spray au poivre; Nunchakus; Lances; Bâtons et armes à bâton; Pistolets paralysants et tasers; Épées; Étoiles de ninja; Fouets
sk-SK: Dospelý > Zbrane a príslušenstvo k zbraniam > Zbrane: Boxery; Palice a obušky; Bojové nože; Zbrane; Kasery; Nunčaky; Kopije; Palice a palicové zbrane; Paralyzéry a tasery; Meče; Vrhacie hviezdice; Biče
da: Voksne > Våben og våbentilbehør > Våben: Knojern; Køller og knipler; Nærkampsknive; Pistoler; Peberspray; Nunchaku; Spyd; Køller og stavvåben; Strømpistoler; Sværd; Kastestjerner; Piske
el: Είδη ενηλίκων > Όπλα & αξεσουάρ Όπλων > Όπλα (Weapons): Σιδιρογροθιές; Ρόπαλα και ραβδιά; Μαχαίρια μάχης; Όπλα (Guns); Ρόπαλα και σπρέι πιπεριού; Νουτσάκου; Δόρατα; Ραβδιά και ραβδωτά όπλα; Όπλα ηλεκτροσόκ και τέιζερ; Ξίφη; Αστέρια ρίψης; Μαστίγια
lt-LT: Prekės suaugusiesiems > Ginklai ir ginklų priedai > Ginklai: Kastetai; Kuokos; Koviniai peiliai; Pistoletai; Ašarinės ir pipirinės dujos; Nunčiakai; Ietys; Lazdos; Elektrošokeriai ir tazeriai; Kardai; Svaidomosios žvaigždutės; Botagai
fi: Aikuiset > Aseet ja asetarvikkeet > Aseet: Nyrkkiraudat; Nuijat ja pamput; Taisteluveitset; Ampuma-aseet; Kyynelkaasu ja pippurisuihke; Nunchaku-nivelnuijat; Keihäät; Taistelusauvat ja kepit; Tainnutuspistooli ja etälamauttimet; Miekat; Heittotähdet; Ruoskat
nb: Voksen > Våpen og våpentilbehør > Våpen: Slåsshansker; Klubber og batonger; Kampkniver; Skytevåpen; Pepperspray; Nunchucks; Spyd; Staver og stikkvåpen; Elektrosjokkvåpen; Sverd; Kastestjerner; Pisker
pt-BR: Adultos > Armas e acessórios para armas > Armas: Soco inglês; Porretes e bastões; Facas militares; Armas de fogo; Spray de pimenta; Nunchaku; Lanças e azagaias; Armas de bastão; Armas imobilizadoras; Espadas; Estrelas de arremesso; Chicotes
tr: Yetişkinlere Yönelik Ürünler > Silahlar ve Silah Aksesuarları > Silahlar: Muştalar; Sopalar ve Batonlar; Dövüş Bıçakları; Tabancalar; Mace ve Biber Gazı Spreyi; Nunçakular; Mızraklar; Sopa ve Çubuk Silahlar; Şok Tabancaları; Kılıçlar; Ninja Yıldızları; Kırbaçlar
es: Productos para adultos > Armas y accesorios para armas > Armas: Puños americanos; Garrotes; Cuchillos de combate; Pistolas; Aerosol de defensa personal; Nunchakus; Lanzas; Báculos y mazas; Armas eléctricas y pistolas paralizantes; Espadas; Estrellas ninja; Fustas y látigos
nl: Volwassenen > Wapens en wapenaccessoires > Wapens: Boksbeugels; Knuppels; Gevechtsmessen; Vuurwapens; Traangas en pepperspray; Nunchucks; Speren; Stokwapens; Stunguns en tasers; Zwaarden; Werpsterren; Zwepen
sl-SI: Odrasla vsebina > Orožje in dodatki za orožje > Orožje: Boksarji; Palice in kiji; Bojni noži; Pištole; Obrambni spreji in solzivci; Nunčaki; Kopja; Palice in bojne palice; Pištole za omamljanje in električni paralizatorji; Meči; Metalne zvezde; Biči
en: Mature > Weapons & Weapon Accessories > Weapons: Brass Knuckles; Clubs & Batons; Combat Knives; Guns; Mace & Pepper Spray; Nunchucks; Spears; Staff & Stick Weapons; Stun Guns & Tasers; Swords; Throwing Stars; Whips
zh-TW: 成人用品 > 武器配件 > 武器: 手指虎; 棍/棒; 戰鬥刀; 槍; 梅西/辣椒噴霧; 雙截棍; 標槍; 棍/棒武器; 電擊槍; 劍; 流星鏢; 鞭子
th: สำหรับผู้ใหญ่ > อาวุธและอุปกรณ์เสริมอาวุธ > อาวุธ: สนับมือทองเหลือง; ตะบองและกระบอง; มีดต่อสู้; ปืน; สเปรย์พริกและพริกไทย; กระบอง 2 ท่อน; หอก; ไม้เท้าและพลอง; ปืนช็อตไฟฟ้า; ดาบ; ดาวกระจาย; แส้
hr-HR: Za odrasle > Oružje i pribor za oružje > Oružja: Bokseri; Batine i palice; Borbeni noževi; Pištolji; Suzavci; Nunčake; Koplje; Štapno oružje; Omamljivači i elektrošokeri; Mačevi; Šuriken; Bičevi
pl: Dojrzały > Broń i akcesoria do broni > Broń: Kastety; Pałki; Noże szturmowe; Broń palna; Gaz muszkatołowy i pieprzowy; Nunczaka; Włócznie; Pałki do sztuk walki; Paralizatory; Miecze; Gwiazdki do rzucania; Baty
ja: 成人向け > 武器&武器関連用品 > 武器: ナックルダスター; 棍棒&警棒; コンバットナイフ; 銃; Mace&催涙スプレー; ヌンチャク; 槍; 棒&杖状の武器; スタンガン&テーザー銃; 刀剣; 手裏剣; 鞭
bg-BG: За възрастни > Оръжия и аксесоари за оръжие > Оръжия: Месингови кокалчета; Бухалки и палки; Бойни ножове; Оръжия; Газови и лютиви спрейове; Нунчаку; Копия; Оръжия с тояга и пръчки; Тейзъри и електрошокови пистолети; Мечове; Шурикени; Камшици
de: Reif > Waffen und Waffenzubehör > Waffen: Schlagringe; Schlagstockwaffen; Kampfmesser; Schusswaffen; Tränengas & Pfefferspray; Nunchakus; Speere; Stab- und Stockwaffen; Elektroschocker und Elektroschockpistolen; Schwerter; Wurfsterne; Peitschen
ko: 성인용 제품 > 무기/무기 부대용품 > 무기: 브래스 너클; 곤봉/경봉; 전투용 칼; 총기; 호신용 메이스/페퍼 스프레이; 쌍절곤; 작살; 지팡이/봉 무기; 전기 충격기/테이저 총; 검; 표창; 채찍
zh-CN: 成人 > 武器/武器配件 > 武器: 指节铜环; 棍棒与警棍; 格斗刀; 枪支; 梅斯催泪/胡椒喷雾剂; 双截棍; 矛; 棍棒类武器; 电枪/电击枪; 剑; 星形飞镖; 鞭
ru: Товары для взрослых > Оружие и аксессуары для него > Оружие: Кастеты; Дубинки; Боевые ножи; Огнестрельное оружие; Газовые и перцовые баллончики; Нунчаки; Копья; Палки; Электрошокеры и тазеры; Мечи; Метательные звездочки; Плетки
it: Articoli per adulti > Armi e accessori per armi > Armi: Tirapugni ottone; Bastoni e mazze; Coltelli da guerra; Pistole; Gas lacrimogeno e spray al pepe; Nunchuk; Lance; Bastoni e armi ad asta; Pistole stordenti e taser; Spade; Shuriken; Fruste
sv: Avsett för vuxna > Vapen och vapentillbehör > Vapen: Knogjärn; Klubbor och batonger; Närstridsknivar; Eldvapen; Tårgas och pepparspray; Nunchaku; Spjut; Stav- och stickvapen; Chockpistoler och projektilskjutande elchockvapen; Svärd; Kaststjärnor; Piskor
vi: Trưởng thành > Vũ khí và Phụ kiện vũ khí > Vũ khí: Nắm đấm gấu; Gậy và dùi cui; Dao chiến đấu; Súng; Bình xịt hơi cay; Côn nhị khúc; Giáo mác; Gậy & Gậy vũ khí; Súng bắn điện; Thanh kiếm; Sao ném; Roi
ro-RO: Adulți > Arme și accesorii pentru arme > Arme: Rozete din alamă; Bâte și bastoane; Cuțite de luptă; Arme de foc; Sprayuri de autoapărare mace și cu piper; Nunchuck-uri; Sulițe; Arme tip baston și băț; Pistoale asomatoare și dispozitive taser; Săbii; Steluțe pentru aruncat la țintă; Bice